Hawaii statutes.
[§580-3.5] Personal judgment against absent
defendant. In any proceeding in the family court, the court shall have the
power to render a personal judgment against a party who is outside of this
State and over whom jurisdiction is acquired by service of process in the
manner set forth in section 580-3(b) or (c), if the party was personally served
with a copy of the summons or order to show cause and complaint or other
pleading upon which the judgment is based and if the party was a domiciliary of
this State (1) at the time that the cause of action which is the subject of the
proceeding arose, or (2) at the time of the commencement of the proceeding, or
(3) at the time of service. [L 1970, c 24, §1]

Rules of Court

Default judgment, see HFCR rule 55.

Case Notes

Where child support proceeding commenced when mother filed
complaint for divorce, child support enforcement agency's motion for
modification of child support payments filed twelve years later was
"continuation of proceeding", and, under §580-47 and this section,
court had continuing jurisdiction over non-Hawaii domiciliary father. 87 H.
209 (App.), 953 P.2d 968.

Hawaii Legal Reporter Citations

Division of real property located outside State. 78-2 HLR
78-1129.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next